src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON c1 ! class 1, inherently sg
+N+Sg: # ;
+N+Du: # ;
+N+Pl:%>gau # ;

LEXICON c2 ! class 2. inherently pl
+N+Sg:%>gau # ;
+N+Du: # ;
+N+Pl: # ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
