src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
!! Nouns
!  -----
!! Nouns in UNDEFINED language are things.

LEXICON Nouns

chē̲̂ c1 "horse/two horses" ; ! pl w/ addition of -gau: chē̲̂gau "horses".
tṓ̲sè c2 "bones/two bones" ; ! sg w/ addition of -gau: tṓ̲sègau "bone."

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
